Utah statutes.
17-41-304.   Public hearing -- Review and action on proposal.
(1)  After receipt of the written reports from the advisory committee and
planning commission, or after the 45 days have expired, whichever is earlier,
the county or municipal legislative body shall:
(a)  schedule a public hearing;
(b)  provide notice of the public hearing by:
(i)  publishing notice:
(A)  in a newspaper having general circulation within:
(I)  the same county as the land proposed for inclusion within the agriculture
protection area or industrial protection area, if the land is within the
unincorporated part of the county; or
(II)  the same city or town as the land proposed for inclusion within an
agriculture protection area or industrial protection area, if the land is
within a city or town; and
(B) on the Utah Public Notice Website created in Section 63F-1-701;
(ii)  posting notice at five public places, designated by the applicable
legislative body, within or near the proposed agriculture protection area or
industrial protection area; and
(iii)  mailing written notice to each owner of land within 1,000 feet of the
land proposed for inclusion within an agriculture protection area or
industrial protection area; and
(c)  ensure that the notice includes:
(i)  the time, date, and place of the public hearing on the proposal;
(ii)  a description of the proposed agriculture protection area or industrial
protection area;
(iii)  any proposed modifications to the proposed agriculture protection area
or industrial protection area;
(iv)  a summary of the recommendations of the advisory committee and planning
commission; and
(v)  a statement that interested persons may appear at the public hearing and
speak in favor of or against the proposal, any proposed modifications to the
proposal, or the recommendations of the advisory committee and planning
commission.
(2)  The applicable legislative body shall:
(a)  convene the public hearing at the time, date, and place specified in the
notice; and
(b)  take verbal or written testimony from interested persons.
(3) (a)  Within 120 days of the submission of the proposal, the applicable
legislative body shall approve, modify and approve, or reject the proposal.
(b)  The creation of an agriculture protection area or industrial protection
area is effective at the earlier of:
(i)  the applicable legislative body's approval of a proposal or modified
proposal; or
(ii)  120 days after submission of a proposal complying with Subsection
17-41-301(2) if the applicable legislative body has failed to approve or
reject the proposal within that time.
(4) (a)  In order to give constructive notice of the existence of the
agriculture protection area or industrial protection area to all persons who
have, may acquire, or may seek to acquire an interest in land in or adjacent
to the agriculture protection area or industrial protection area,
respectively, within 10 days of the creation of an agriculture protection area
or industrial protection area, the applicable legislative body shall file an
executed document containing a legal description of the agriculture protection
area or industrial protection area, as the case may be, with:
(i)  the county recorder of deeds; and
(ii)  the affected planning commission.
(b)  If the legal description of the property to be included in the
agriculture protection area or industrial protection area is available through
the county recorder's office, the applicable legislative body shall use that
legal description in its executed document required in Subsection (4)(a).
(5)  Within 10 days of the recording of the agriculture protection area, the
applicable legislative body shall:
(a)  send written notification to the commissioner of agriculture and food
that the agriculture protection area has been created; and
(b)  include in the notification:
(i)  the number of landowners owning land within the agriculture protection
area;
(ii)  the total acreage of the area;
(iii)  the date of approval of the area; and
(iv)  the date of recording.
(6)  The applicable legislative body's failure to record the notice required
under Subsection (4) or to send the written notification under Subsection (5)
does not invalidate the creation of an agriculture protection area.
(7)  The applicable legislative body may consider the cost of recording notice
under Subsection (4) and the cost of sending notification under Subsection (5)
in establishing a fee under Subsection 17-41-301(4)(b).
